Utah statutes.
31A-34-104.   Alliance -- Required license.

(1)  A person shall be licensed as an alliance pursuant to this chapter to directly or indirectly make available or otherwise arrange for health insurance through multiple unaffiliated insurers through the use of coordinated actuarial models, coordinated underwriting, or coordinated marketing methodologies.

(2) (a)  A person may not hold itself out as a health insurance purchasing alliance, purchasing alliance, health insurance purchasing cooperative, purchasing cooperative, or otherwise use a similar name unless licensed by the commissioner as an alliance.

(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(a), a person may hold itself out as a voluntary health insurance purchasing association without being licensed by the commissioner as provided in Section 31A-34-105.

(3)  To apply for licensure as an alliance, a person shall complete an application in a form designated by the commissioner and file it with the commissioner, together with the applicable filing fees determined by the commissioner under Section 63J-1-504.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

